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DTC B0103/12 Short in D Squib Circuit (to B+)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The D squib circuit consists of the airbag sensor assembly, the spiral cable and the steering wheel pad.
It causes the SRS to deploy when the SRS deployment conditions are satisfied.
For details of the function of each components, see page OPERATION on page RS−3.
DTC B0103/12 is recorded when a B+ short is detected in the D squib circuit.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

B0103/12

S Short circuit in D squib circuit (to B+)
S D squib malfunction
S Spiral cable malfunction
S Airbag sensor assembly malfunction

S Steering wheel pad (D squib)
S Spiral cable
S Airbag sensor assembly
SDashwire
SColumnwire

WIRING DIAGRAM
See page DI−452.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection (See step 1 on page DI−764).

2 Check D squib circuit.

PREPARATION:
Connect thenegative ( −) terminal cable to thebattery,andwait
at least for2seconds.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON.
(b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and D+ of

the orange connector on the steering wheel pad (D squib)
side between the airbag sensor assembly and the steer-
ing wheel pad (D squib).

OK:
Voltage:Below 1 V

NG Go to step 5.

OK
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3 Check airbag sensor assembly.

PREPARATION:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
(b) Disconnect the negative (−) terminal cable from the bat-

tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.
(c) Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.
(d) Using a service wire, connect D+ and D− of the orange

connector on the steering wheel pad (D squib) side be-
tween the airbag sensor assembly and the steering wheel
pad (D squib).

(e) Connect the negative (−) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI−432).
(c) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 10

seconds.
(d) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(e) Check the DTC (See page DI−432).
OK:

DTCB0 103/12 isnotoutput.
HINT:
Codes other than code B0103/12 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG Replace airbag sensor assembly.

OK
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4 Check D squib.

PREPARATION:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
(b) Disconnect the negative (−) terminal cable from the bat-

tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.
(c) Connect the steering wheel pad (D squib) to the spiral

cable.
(d) Connect the negative (−) terminal cable to the battery,

and wait at least for 2 seconds.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI−432).
(c)Turn the ignitionswitch toLOCK,andwaitat least for10

seconds.
(d) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(e) Check the DTC (See page DI−432).
OK:

DTCB0 103/12 isnotoutput.
HINT:
Codes other than code B0103/12 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG Replace steering wheel pad (D squib).

OK

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.
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5 Check spiral cable.

PREPARATION:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
(b)Disconnect thespiral cableconnector fromthecolumn

wire.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON.
(b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and D+ of

the orange spiral cable connector on the steering wheel
pad (D squib) side.

OK:
Voltage:Below 1 V

NG Replace spiral cable.

OK

6 Check column wire.

PREPARATION:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
(b) Disconnect the column wire connector from the dash

wire.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON.
(b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and D+ of

the column wire connector on the spiral cable side.
OK:

Voltage:Below 1 V

NGRepairor replacecolumnwire.

OK
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7 Check dash wire.

CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON.
(b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and D+ of

the dash wire connector on the column wire side.
OK:

Voltage: Below 1 V

NG Repair or replace dash wire.

OK

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.


